Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3966
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Milk Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) 3-A Sanitary Standards has the same meaning as in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance;

(2) Acceptable milk means milk that qualifies under sections 2-3979 to 2-3982 as to sight and odor and that is classified acceptable for somatic cells, bacterial content, drug residues, and sediment content;

(3) Components of milk means whey, whey and milk protein concentrate, whey cream, cream, butter, skim milk, condensed milk, ultra-filtered milk, milk powder, dairy blends that are at least fifty-one percent dairy components, and any similar milk byproduct;

(4) C-I-P or cleaned-in-place means the procedure by which sanitary pipelines or pieces of dairy equipment are mechanically cleaned in place by circulation;

(5) Dairy products means products allowed to be made from milk for manufacturing purposes and not required to be of Grade A quality;

(6) Department means the Department of Agriculture;

(7) Director means the Director of Agriculture or his or her duly authorized agent or designee;

(8) Field representative means an individual qualified and trained in the sanitary methods of production and handling of milk as set forth in the Nebraska Milk Act and who is generally employed by a processing or manufacturing milk plant or cooperative for the purpose of quality control work;

(9) First purchaser means a person who purchases raw milk directly from the farm for processing or for resale to a processor, who purchases milk products or components of milk for processing or resale to a processor, or who utilizes milk from the first purchaser's own farm for the manufacturing of milk products or dairy products;

(10) Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance means the documents delineated in subsection (3) of section 2-3965;

(11) Milk for manufacturing purposes means milk produced for processing and manufacturing into products not required by law to be of Grade A quality;

(12) Milk distributor means a person who distributes milk, fluid milk, milk products, or dairy products whether or not the milk is shipped within or into the state. The term does not include (a) a milk plant, a bulk milk hauler/sampler, or a milk producer, as such terms are defined in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance, (b) a food establishment as defined in the Nebraska Pure Food Act, or (c) a private home not included in the definition of a food establishment in section 81-2,245.01;

(13) Probational milk means milk classified undergrade for somatic cells, bacterial content, or sediment content that may be accepted by plants for specific time periods; and

(14) Reject milk means milk that does not qualify under sections 2-3979 to 2-3982.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 3, p. 69;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.89;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 14;

Laws 1981, LB 333, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 12;

Laws 1988, LB 871, § 19;

Laws 1990, LB 856, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 77;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3914;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB67, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB333, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 20.

Nebraska Pure Food Act, see section 81-2,239.